New Jersey, session 221, S2671.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Governor shall establish and maintain a voluntary resume bank for individuals with a disability who wish to be appointed to a State board, commission, authority, or a similar State entity that provides for the appointment of private citizens into its membership, which entities shall include, but shall not be limited to, special committees, councils, and tasks forces.  The Governor shall maintain an Internet webpage that lists available appointments within such entities. b.    The resume bank shall be accessible to the executive branch and the Legislature.  The resume bank shall contain features permitting individuals with a disability to upload or submit their resume to the bank. c.     The resume bank shall contain the following information: (1)   the resume of an individual with a disability who wishes to be appointed to a State board or commission; (2)   the name, address, and telephone number of the individual with a disability; (3)   any pertinent information related to the individuals disability; and (4)   any pertinent information as to particular State boards, commissions, authorities, and other similar State entities that are of interest to the individual with a disability. 1d.   Notwithstanding any statute, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the resume bank shall not be subject to the "Senator Byron M. Baer Open Public Meetings Act," P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-6 et seq.).  Information provided to the resume bank shall be confidential and unavailable to the public.1 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.